Washington statutes.
RCW 35.20.010

Municipal court established—Termination of court—Agreement covering costs of handling resulting criminal cases—Arbitration—Notice.

(1) There is hereby created and established in each incorporated city of this state having a population of more than four hundred thousand inhabitants, as shown by the federal or state census, whichever is the later, a municipal court, which shall be styled "The Municipal Court of . . . . . . (name of city)," hereinafter designated and referred to as the municipal court, which court shall have jurisdiction and shall exercise all the powers by this chapter declared to be vested in such municipal court, together with such powers and jurisdiction as is generally conferred in this state either by common law or statute. However, no municipal court established under this section shall have jurisdiction over any matter until six months after a notice of intent to create a new municipal court is sent to the administrative office of the courts.

(2) A municipality operating a municipal court under this section may terminate that court if the municipality has reached an agreement with the county under chapter 39.34 RCW under which the county is to be paid a reasonable amount for costs associated with prosecution, adjudication, and sentencing in criminal cases filed in district court as a result of the termination. However, no municipal court may be terminated under this section unless a notice of intent to terminate is sent to the administrative office of the courts six months in advance of the termination. The agreement shall provide for periodic review and renewal of the terms of the agreement. If the municipality and the county are unable to agree on the terms for renewal of the agreement, they shall be deemed to have entered into an agreement to submit the issue to arbitration under chapter 7.04A RCW. Pending conclusion of the arbitration proceeding, the terms of the agreement shall remain in effect. The municipality and the county have the same rights and are subject to the same duties as other parties who have agreed to submit to arbitration under chapter 7.04A RCW.

(3) A city that has entered into an agreement for court services with the county must provide written notice of the intent to terminate the agreement to the county legislative authority and to the administrative office of the courts not less than one year prior to February 1st of the year in which all district court judges are subject to election. A city that terminates an agreement for court services to be provided by a district court may terminate the agreement only at the end of a four-year district court judicial term.

(4) A county that wishes to terminate an agreement with a city for the provision of court services must provide written notice of the intent to terminate the agreement to the city legislative authority and to the administrative office of the courts not less than one year prior to the expiration of the agreement.

[ 2024 c 61 s 5; 2005 c 433 s 37; 2001 c 68 s 3; 1984 c 258 s 201; 1975 c 33 s 4; 1965 c 7 s 35.20.010. Prior: 1955 c 290 s 1.]

NOTES:

Application—Captions not law—Savings—Effective date—2005 c 433: See RCW 7.04A.290 through 7.04A.310 and 7.04A.900.

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.

Severability—1975 c 33: See note following RCW 35.21.780.